Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB731.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 17 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 17. Probation Without Verdict.--Except as provided in clause (1) of this subsection, the court may place a person on probation without verdict if the person pleads nolo contendere or guilty to any nonviolent offense under this act and the person proves he is drug dependent. For the purposes of proving drug dependency, the person must present the testimony 12345678910111213141516171819202122 of a physician or psychologist trained in the field of drug abuse. The term of probation shall be for a specific time period not to exceed the maximum for the offense upon such reasonable terms and conditions as the court may require. The following shall apply:* * *(4) Upon being granted probation without verdict, the sum total of fines and court costs that the offender is required to pay as a condition of the probation without verdict shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0731PN0755 - 2 - 1234567891011